Utah statutes.
9-12-103.   Eligibility criteria.
In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act,
the department may make rules establishing eligibility criteria for recipients
of assistance under this chapter.  A recipient of assistance under this
chapter must demonstrate:
(1)  that the recipient's family, household, or individual income is 150% of
the federal poverty level or less;
(2)  that the recipient is responsible for paying the recipient's home energy
costs; and
(3)  compliance with any rules established by the department under this
section.
